Utah statutes.
16-10a-832.   Resignation and removal of officers.
(1)  An officer may resign at any time by giving written notice of the
resignation to the corporation.
(2)  A resignation of an officer is effective when the notice is received by
the corporation, unless the notice specifies a later effective date.
(3)  If a resignation is made effective at a later date, the board of
directors may permit the officer to remain in office until the effective date
and may fill the pending vacancy before the effective date if the board of
directors provides that the successor does not take office until the effective
date, or the board of directors may remove the officer at any time prior to
the effective date and may fill the resulting vacancy.
(4)  Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the board of directors may
remove any officer at any time with or without cause.  The bylaws or the board
of directors may make provision for the removal of officers by other officers
or by the shareholders.
(5)  An officer who resigns or is removed or whose appointment has expired may
deliver to the division for filing a statement to that effect pursuant to
Section 16-10a-1608.
